Arkansas, session 2025, HB1519.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF ARKANSAS:

SECTION 1. DO NOT CODIFY. Legislative findings and intent.
(a) The General Assembly finds that:
(1) Shared services allow state agencies to streamline
workflows, accelerate decision-making, and improve administrative
responsiveness;
(2) This act allows for the pooling of resources and the
coordination of essential services, such as human resources, procurement, and
information technology, to enhance efficiency, reduce costs, and minimize
waste while complying with state and federal law; and
(3) Shared services allow state agencies to benefit from
standardized services, encourages collaboration, interagency cooperation, and
*ANS190*
03-11-2025 09:47:44 ANS190

As Engrossed: H3/11/25 HB1519
resource sharing, fostering greater knowledge exchange and expertise across
government entities.
(b) It is the intent of the General Assembly that the Secretary of
Commerce who participates in shared services shall comply with all applicable
state and federal laws.

SECTION 2. Arkansas Code § 25-43-303(e), concerning the duties and
powers of the Secretary of the Department of Commerce, is amended to read as
follows:
(e) The secretary may, unless otherwise provided by law:
(1) Hire Department of Commerce personnel;
(2) Perform or assign duties assigned to the Department of
Commerce; and
(3) Be appointed Except as provided under subdivision (f)(1) of
this section, serve as the director or the administrative or executive head
of any state entity under the administrative control of the Department of
Commerce if the secretary also meets all statutory requirements for the
position.

SECTION 3. Arkansas Code § 25-43-303(g)(1), concerning the ability of
the Secretary of the Department of Commerce to delegate hiring decisions, is
amended to read as follows:
(g)(1) The secretary shall delegate the authority to hire employees and
to make employment contracts for work performed to the following officers for
their respective departments, to the extent necessary to comply with state or
federal law:
(A) The Insurance Commissioner;
(B) The Bank Commissioner; and
(C) The Securities Commissioner.

/s/Cavenaugh





03-11-2025 09:47:44 ANS190